Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2234
Sheriff; return of process.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to make due return of all legal process to him or her directed and by him or her delivered or served by certified or registered mail, at the proper office and on the proper return day thereof, or if the judgment is recorded in the district court, appealed, or stayed, upon which he or she has an execution, on notice thereof, to return the execution, stating thereon such facts.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 173, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 22-1503;

Laws 1933, c. 44, § 4, p. 253;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 22-1503;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,174;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,174;

Laws 1987, LB 93, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-597;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 18;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 41.